Illinois, session 104th, HB3422.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Professional Regulation Law 5of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by 6adding Section 2105-410 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2105/2105-410 new)8    Sec. 2105-410. Department licensure report.9    (a) The Department shall conduct a review of each license, 10certification, or other authority issued or conferred by the 11Department, including any costs and fees associated with such 12authorities. The Department shall create a report based on 13this review and deliver said report to the General Assembly no 14later than 12 months prior to termination of the relevant 15licensing Act under the Regulatory Sunset Act. The report 16shall be publicly published on the Department's website no 17later than 30 days prior to the date the report is delivered to 18the General Assembly. The report shall include, but is not 19limited to, the following recommendations and any data, 20assumptions, or other analysis utilized to make each 21recommendation:22        (1) whether the license, certification, or other 23    authority is necessary to meet a demonstrated public   HB3422- 2 -LRB104 09875 AAS 19943 b1    safety or welfare interest;2        (2) whether the conditions that led to the initial 3    creation of the license, certification, or other authority 4    have changed and whether other conditions have arisen that 5    would warrant more, less, or the same degree of regulation 6    and oversight;7        (3) if the license, certification, or other authority 8    is necessary, whether the existing rules and regulations 9    establish the least restrictive form of governmental 10    regulation and oversight consistent with the demonstrated 11    public interest, considering other available regulatory 12    mechanisms;13        (4) if the license, certification, or other authority 14    is necessary, whether Department rules pertaining to the 15    license, certification, or other authority enhance the 16    demonstrated public interest and are within the scope of 17    legislative intent;18        (5) the economic impact of the license, certification, 19    or other authority and, if national economic information 20    is not available, whether the license, certification, or 21    other authority stimulates or restricts competition;22        (6) the budget and administration of the program, 23    including, but not limited to:24            (A) the adequacy of current staffing levels;25            (B) the cost of required and current staffing 26        levels to meet the needs of the issuance and   HB3422- 3 -LRB104 09875 AAS 19943 b1        disciplinary process;2            (C) the adequacy of current physical, software, 3        and technical resources;4            (D) the cost of required and current physical, 5        software, and technical resources;6            (E) the speed of application processing and 7        issuance for both original licenses and renewals;8            (F) the cost of application processing; and9            (G) the necessity, efficiency and efficacy of 10        disciplinary procedures; and11            (H) the cost of disciplinary action;12        (7) whether complaint, investigation, and disciplinary 13    procedures adequately protect the public and whether final 14    dispositions of complaints are in the demonstrated public 15    interest or self-serving to the profession or regulated 16    entity;17        (8) whether the scope of practice of the regulated 18    occupation or profession contributes to the optimum use of 19    personnel;20        (9) whether the regulation and administration of the 21    license, certification, or other authority include 22    numerous stakeholders and the public to ensure fairness;23        (10) whether fees associated with the license, 24    certification, or other authority are fair, taking into 25    consideration factor that include, but are not limited to:26            (A) the average annual income of an applicant;  HB3422- 4 -LRB104 09875 AAS 19943 b1            (B) the average annual income of a person in the 2        occupation or profession;3            (C) the cost of education and other requirements 4        necessary to perform the services and duties of the 5        occupation or profession;6            (D) the cost to the Department of administering 7        the program; and8            (E) if fees are not fair, what a fair fee would 9        look like;10        (11) whether the current number of training, education 11    and, continuing education days are only those demonstrably 12    necessary to protect health and safety;13        (12) whether the Department imposes any sanctions or 14    disqualifications on applicants based on past criminal 15    history and, if so, whether the sanctions or 16    disqualifications serve a public safety or commercial or 17    consumer protection interest, including data on the 18    following:19            (A) the number of applications that the Department 20        denied based on an applicant's criminal history and 21        the criminal offenses that led to the 22        disqualification;23            (B) the number of licenses, certifications, or 24        other authorities issued based upon an applicant's 25        criminal history; and26            (C) the number of licenses, certifications, or   HB3422- 5 -LRB104 09875 AAS 19943 b1        other authorities revoked or suspended based on an 2        individual's criminal conduct and the criminal 3        offenses that led to the sanction; and4        (13) whether administrative and statutory changes are 5    necessary to improve agency operations to enhance the 6    public interest or to ensure that the standards for 7    applicants are not vague and are consistent with the 8    demonstrated public safety or welfare interest 9    necessitating the regulation.10    Nothing in this subsection (a) shall be construed to 11prevent the Department from conducting a review or publishing 12and delivering a report prior to 12 months before the 13termination of a licensing Act under the Regulatory Sunset Act 14if the Secretary reasonably believes a different level of 15regulation is the least restrictive necessary to meet the 16demonstrated public safety or welfare interest or the 17Department has received requests to alter the current level of 18regulation.19    (b) Notwithstanding any Section of this Act, the 20Department shall conduct a review of each potential new 21Department license, certification, or authority, including any 22costs and fees associated with the potential new authority. 23The Department shall create a new license, certification, or 24authority report based on this review and deliver the report 25to the General Assembly no later than 30 days after the filing 26date of the bill in which the license, certification, or   HB3422- 6 -LRB104 09875 AAS 19943 b1authority is proposed. The report must be published on the 2Department's website no later than the date the report is 3delivered to the General Assembly. The report shall include, 4but is not limited to, the following recommendations and any 5data, assumptions or other analysis utilized to make each 6recommendation:7        (1) whether the license, certification, or authority 8    is necessary to meet a demonstrated public safety or 9    welfare interest;10        (2) the conditions that led to the proposal of the 11    license, certification, or authority and whether other 12    conditions have arisen that would warrant more, less, or 13    the same degree of regulation and oversight as that 14    proposed;15        (3) whether the proposed license, certification, or 16    authority establishes the least restrictive form of 17    governmental regulation and oversight consistent with the 18    demonstrated public interest, considering other available 19    regulatory mechanisms;20        (4) if the license, certification, or authority is 21    necessary, potential Department rules pertaining to the 22    license, certification, or authority and how these rules 23    would enhance the demonstrated public interest and are 24    within the scope of legislative intent;25        (5) the estimated economic impact of the license, 26    certification, or authority and, if national economic   HB3422- 7 -LRB104 09875 AAS 19943 b1    information is not available, whether the license, 2    certification, or authority stimulates or restricts 3    competition;4        (6) the budget and administration constraints of the 5    license, certification, or authority, including, but not 6    limited to:7            (A) the adequacy of current staffing levels to 8        administer the license, certification, or authority;9            (B) the cost of maintaining appropriate staffing 10        levels to meet the needs of the issuance and 11        disciplinary process;12            (C) the adequacy of current physical, software, 13        and technical resources;14            (D) the cost of additional physical, software, and 15        technical resources, if necessary;16            (E) the anticipated cost of license, 17        certification, or authority application processing; 18        and19            (F) the anticipated cost of license, 20        certification, or authority disciplinary procedure;21        (7) whether proposed complaint, investigation, and 22    disciplinary procedures adequately protect the public and 23    the potential methods of evaluating whether final 24    dispositions of complaints are in the demonstrated public 25    interest or self-serving to the profession or regulated 26    entity;  HB3422- 8 -LRB104 09875 AAS 19943 b1        (8) whether the proposed scope of practice of the 2    regulated occupation or profession contributes to the 3    optimum use of personnel;4        (9) whether the regulation and administration of the 5    license, certification, or authority as presented in the 6    bill include input from numerous stakeholders and the 7    public to ensure fairness, or, if such inclusion may be 8    facilitated by Department rulemaking, what type of rules 9    would ensure such inclusion;10        (10) if a fee amount is proposed in the bill, whether 11    fees associated with the license, certification, or 12    authority are fair, taking into consideration factors that 13    include, but are not limited to, the following:14            (A) the average annual income of an applicant;15            (B) the average annual income of a person in the 16        occupation or profession;17            (C) the cost of education and other requirements 18        necessary to perform the services and duties of the 19        occupation or profession;20            (D) the cost to the Department of administering 21        the license, certification, or authority; and22            (E) if fees are left to the discretion of the 23        Department, an estimate of a fair fee;24        (11) whether the proposed number of training, 25    education, and continuing education days, if any, are only 26    demonstrably necessary to protect health and safety. If no   HB3422- 9 -LRB104 09875 AAS 19943 b1    number of training, education, or continuing education 2    days are proposed, a Department estimate thereof;3        (12) whether the Department, through the license, 4    certification, or authority proposed, would impose any 5    sanctions or disqualifications on applicants based on past 6    criminal history and, if so, whether the sanctions or 7    disqualifications proposed serve a public safety or 8    commercial or consumer protection interest; and9        (13) whether changes to the bill language are 10    necessary to improve Department operations to enhance the 11    demonstrated public interest or to ensure license, 12    certification, or authority standards for all applicants 13    are not vague and are consistent with the demonstrated 14    public safety or welfare interest necessitating the 15    regulation and suggested language making the changes.16    The Department shall complete a review and report under 17subsection (a) of this Section for any license, certification, 18or authority reviewed under this subsection (b) which becomes 19law 24 months after the license, certification or authority's 20effective date and shall subsequently conduct review and 21reporting duties under subsection (a) according to the 22specified schedule.23    Nothing in this subsection (b) shall be construed to 24prevent the Department from conducting a review or publishing 25and delivering a report prior to the filing date of a piece of 26legislation if the Secretary reasonably believes a new   HB3422- 10 -LRB104 09875 AAS 19943 b1license, certification, or authority is necessary to meet a 2demonstrated public safety or welfare interest or the 3Department has received requests to regulate a previously 4unregulated profession.